dictionaries/uk/index.dic
адмініструватися/Xyt
алітувати/Xyt
антропоморфізувати/XytN
атенуювати/XytN
балясувати/Xyt
белькотіти/Xyt
блиснути/X
браконьєрити/Xyt
будитися/XLyt
в'явитися/X
вбілитися/XL
ввічнити/XNL
вгоріти/X
вдрукувати/XN
ветувати/XytN
взаконити/XJN
вибрати/X'
вивалюватися/Xyt
вивуджувати/Xyt
виголитися/XL
видаватися/Xyt
видужувати/Xyt
визолотити/XN
викликатися/XYyO
викохуватися/Xyt
виладновувати/Xyt
вилужуватися/Xyt
вимережувати/Xyt
вимурувати/X'N
випалити/XLN
виплодитися/X
випрацювати/XN'
вирватися/X
висварити/XNL
висковзнути/X
виснувати/X'
вистрочуватися/Xyt
витеребитися/X
виторочуватися/Xyt
виучити/XNL
виховувати/Xyt'
вичакловувати/Xyt
вишіптуватися/Xyt
вищербити/XN
відбрязкотіти/X
відвішувати/Xyt'
відгостювати/X
віддушитися/XL
відімкнути/XNl
відколоситися/X
відкуплюватися/Xyt
відлютовуватися/Xyt
відмурувати/XN
відпилюватися/Xyt
відпрацьовуватися/Xyt
відригувати/Xyt'
відсторонити/XLN
відфотографувати/XN
відшліфувати/XN
вклонити/XL
вмазатися/X
воркнути/X
впорядковувати/Xyt
всиновлюватися/Xyt
втиритися/X
входити/XJyt
гарантувати/XytN
глаголити/Xyt
граничити/Xyt
двигтіти/Xyt
демаркуватися/Xyt
детронізувати/XytN
діагностувати/XytN
довоюватися/X
докапіталізовувати/Xyt
долюбити/X
допарювати/Xyt'
досаджуватися/Xyt
дотерпітися/X
драматизувати/XytN
екстрагуватися/Xyt
жужелювати/Xyt
заблоковувати/Xyt'
завалитися/XL
загадувати/Xyt'
заголосити/X
заджерґотіти/X
зазеленити/XNL
закидуватися/Xyt
закоптити/XLN
закутувати/Xyt'
замазатися/X
заморожувати/Xyt'
заорганізувати/XN
заплішити/XLN
запродуватися/Xyt
зарум'янитися/XJ
засліджувати/Xyt
застарцювати/X
затарахкотіти/X
затріумфувати/X
захистити/XLN
зачатувати/XN
зашпилитися/XJ
збезволити/XN
звар'ювати/X
згвинчуватися/Xyt
здертися/X
зігнорувати/XN
зловжити/Xl
змірювати/Xyt'
знегазовувати/Xyt
знищуватися/Xyt
зригнути/Xl
зчалюватися/Xyt
інструментувати/XytN
канути/X
кликнути/X
комунізувати/XytN
корумпуватися/Xyt
куйовдитися/Xyt
лицемірити/Xyt
майнути/X
метати/XytY
монтуватися/Xyt
набруньковуватися/Xyt
наглузувати/X
надихувати/Xyt'
наелектризувати/XN
накопичитися/XJ
налупити/XLN
наоліювати/Xyt
наприскувати/Xyt
насипатися/XYyO
настрочити/XLN
наформовувати/Xyt
наштовхуватися/Xyt
недорозвинутися/X
об'юшити/X
обдерновуватися/Xyt
облаштовуватися/Xyt
обмотуватися/Xyt
обсаджувати/Xyt'
обумовити/XJN
одіпнути/X
окиснювати/Xyt
опішити/XN
освіжити/XLN
отирлуватися/X
пакетуватися/Xyt
перебалакуватися/Xyt
перевіяти/X'
передарувати/XN
перезаявити/XNL
перекопчувати/Xyt'
перелютуватися/Xyt
перенадити/XJN
переп'ясти/X
перепрати/X'
переселитися/XL
пересумувати/XN
переформувати/XN
перчити/XyNL
підговорити/XNL
підкоректувати/XN
підмінитися/XL
підрегульовувати/Xyt
підстригтися/X
підчіплюватися/Xyt
поберегтися/X
повидавлювати/X'
повитоплювати/X'
поворожити/XL
поґуґлити/X
подутися/XY
позаманювати/X
позводити/XJ
поквитувати/XN
покумитися/X
помантачити/XN
понагороджувати/X'
понатоптувати/X'
пооброблювати/X'
поперевтомлюватися/X
попідкопуватися/X
попожартувати/X
попригадувати/X
поранити/XJN
порозмірковувати/X
посвідчувати/Xyt
поснути/X
потакувати/Xyt
потусуватися/X
поцюркотіти/X
прагматизувати/Xyt
пригарцювати/X
прикахикувати/Xyt
примаститися/X
припаювати/Xyt'
присіяти/X'
притамуватися/X
причалювати/Xyt'
пробурчати/X
прогомоніти/X
проєктуватися/Xyt
прокопчувати/Xyt
прометушитися/XL
проплинути/X
прослизнутися/X
просушуватися/Xyt
прохарчати/X
проячати/X
регламентуватися/Xyt
ретранслюватися/Xyt
розбризкуватися/Xyt
розгладжувати/Xyt
роздрібнювати/Xyt'
розклеюватися/Xyt
розкуйовдитися/XJ
розмаювати/Xyt
розпаскудитися/XJ
розпромінюватися/Xyt
розслідуватися/Xyt
розточуватися/Xyt
розчаровувати/Xyt'
рунитися/Xy
самоокуповуватися/Xyt
сепаруватися/Xyt
скеруватися/X
скосити/XLN
слідити/XytL
спарюватися/Xyt
сповнюватися/Xyt
спримітивізувати/XN
стельмахувати/Xyt
стрілити/XJ
сусідити/Xyt
тарабанитися/XJyt
тішитися/XJyt
трестувати/XytN
убризкуватися/Xyt
угородитися/X
уїздити/XytN
уложитися/XL
унормуватися/X
упроситися/XL
ускладнювати/Xyt'
утискувати/Xyt'
учворювати/Xyt
фіналізуватися/Xyt
харчати/Xyt
хулити/XytL
ченцювати/Xyt
шерститися/XLyt
шурхотіти/Xyt
